Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB117.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "qualified taxpayer" in section 1702-H of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1702-H. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Qualified taxpayer." Any natural person, corporation, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 business trust, limited liability company, partnership, limited liability partnership, association or any other form of legal business entity that:(1) Is subject to a tax imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XI or XV, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III.(2) Owns a qualified historic structure.The term includes an entity that is exempt from Federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) and owns a qualified historic structure.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0117PN0068 - 2 - 12345678910111213